Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska11-126
Bonds; deputies or employees of county officers; alternatives.

Whenever any deputy or employee of any county treasurer, county attorney, clerk of the district court, county clerk, county assessor, register of deeds, county sheriff, or county commissioner or supervisor shall be required by law or the order of the county board of any county to supply bond, either (1) such deputy or employee shall furnish a bond by a surety company, which bond shall be approved by the county board, and the county may pay the premium for such bond; or (2) the county board may arrange and pay for the writing of a blanket corporate surety bond for the benefit of the county, bonding (a) all such employees of the county or (b) all such deputy county officials or (c) both subdivisions (a) and (b) of this subdivision.

Laws 1941, c. 17, § 1, p. 101;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 12-124;

Laws 1943, c. 21, § 1(2), p. 113;

R.S.1943, § 11-126;

Laws 1947, c. 78, § 1, p. 245;

Laws 1983, LB 369, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 3.

Elected county officials are required to give individual official bonds. Blanket bond is not sufficient. Foote v. County of Adams, 163 Neb. 406, 80 N.W.2d 179 (1956).